District of Columbia statutes.
47-2832

Repairing of motor vehicles.

(a)

Owners or managers of establishments where motor vehicles of any description are washed, cleaned, greased, oiled, or repaired, for profit or gain, shall pay a license fee of $30 per annum.

(b)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as [a] Motor Vehicles Sales, Services and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 627, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 34
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 557, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(t), 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(28), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(Q), 50 DCR 6913

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2832.
1973 Ed., § 47-2334.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “Motor Vehicle Sales, Service, and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Motor Vehicle Sales, Services and Repair endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(Q) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).